Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1722.01
Property or building; unsafe or unfit for human occupancy; duties.

Whenever the governing body of a municipality has decided by resolution or other determination that a property is unsafe or unfit for human occupancy because of one or more violations of its minimum standard housing ordinance or has decided by resolution or other determination that a building is unsafe because of one or more violations of its local building or construction code, it shall be the duty of such municipality to post the property accordingly and to file a copy of such resolution or other determination in the office of the register of deeds of the county to be recorded. No fee shall be charged for such recording or for the release of such recording.

Laws 1973, LB 373, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 654, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 105.